el: Μέγεθος μαρσμέλοου: Γίγας; Τζάμπο; Micro; Μίνι; Κανονικό; Άλλο
sl-SI: Velikost penastih bonbonov: Velikansko; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Navadno; Drugo
nl: Grootte marsmallows: Gigantisch; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Normaal; Overige
vi: Kích cỡ kẹo dẻo marshmallow: Khổng lồ; Cực lớn; Siêu nhỏ; Cỡ mini; Thường; Khác
fr: Taille de la guimauve: Géant; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Standard; Autre
zh-CN: 棉花糖尺寸: 巨型; 特大号; 微型; 迷你; 常规; 其他
hr-HR: Veličina marshmallowa: Golemo; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Standardno; Ostalo
es: Tamaño del malvavisco: Gigante; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Regular; Otro
it: Dimensione del marshmallow: Gigante; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Normale; Altro
tr: Marshmallow boyutu: Dev; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Normal; Diğer
da: Skumfidusstørrelse: Kæmpe; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Almindelig; Andet
th: ขนาดมาร์ชเมลโลว์: ไจแอนท์; จัมโบ้; ไมโคร; มินิ; ธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
en: Marshmallow size: Giant; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Regular; Other
cs: Velikost marshmallow: Obří; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Standardní; Jiné
ja: マシュマロサイズ: ジャイアント; ジャンボ; マイクロ; ミニ; レギュラー; その他
bg-BG: Размер маршмелоу: Гигантски; Джъмбо; Микро; Мини; Обикновени; Друго
lt-LT: Zefyrų dydis: Milžiniškas; Labai didelis („Jumbo“); Mikro; Mini; Įprastas; Kita
pt-BR: Tamanho do marshmallow: Gigante; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Comum; Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiunea marshmallow-ului: Uriaș; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Normal; Altele
ru: Размер маршмеллоу: Гигантский; Очень крупный; Микро; Мини; Обычный; Другое
pt-PT: Tamanho do marshmallow: Gigante; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Normal; Outro
pl: Rozmiar pianki: Olbrzymie; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Zwykłe; Inne
ko: 마시멜로 크기: 자이언트; 점보; 마이크로; 미니; 일반; 기타
sv: Marshmallowstorlek: Jätte; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Vanlig; Annat
sk-SK: Veľkosť penových cukríkov marshmallow: Obrie; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Bežná; Iná
hu: Pillecukor mérete: Óriás; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Normál; Egyéb
fi: Vaahtokarkin koko: Jätti; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Tavallinen; Muu
zh-TW: 棉花糖尺寸: 特大; 超大; 微型; 迷你; 一般; 其他
nb: Marshmallow-størrelse: Kjempe; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Vanlig; Annet
de: Marshmallowgröße: Riesig; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Standard; Sonstiges